Massachusetts, session 194th, H476.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Subsection (a) of section 52 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (6) and inserting in place thereof 
the following 2 paragraphs:- 
(6) Any bills, charges, debts, payments or collection of such bills, charges, debts or 
payments for medical services rendered by a health care provider as defined in section 1 of 
chapter 111. The provisions of this paragraph shall not be subject to the limitations provided in 
subsection (b). 
(7) Any other adverse item of information which antedates the report by more than 7 
years.